Utah statutes.
62A-15-202.   Definitions.

As used in this part:

(1)  "Juvenile substance abuse offender" means any juvenile found to come within the provisions of Section 78A-6-103 for a drug or alcohol related offense, as designated by the Board of Juvenile Court Judges.

(2)  "Local substance abuse authority" means a county  legislative body designated to provide substance abuse services in accordance with Section 17-43-201.

(3)  "Teen substance abuse school" means any school established by the local substance abuse authority, in cooperation with the Board of Juvenile Court Judges, that provides an educational, interpersonal, skill-building experience for juvenile substance abuse offenders and their parents or legal guardians.



Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

